Washington statutes.
RCW 19.225.020

Service of process.

By acting as an athlete agent in this state, a nonresident individual appoints the secretary of state as the individual's agent for service of process in any civil action in this state related to acting as an athlete agent in this state.

[ 2016 sp.s. c 13 s 2; 2002 c 131 s 3.]